Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.053

Exemption from judicial process, taxes—Exceptions—Deduction for insurance upon request.

(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of a person to a retirement allowance, disability allowance, or death benefit, to the return of accumulated contributions, the retirement, disability or death allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, and the moneys in the fund created under this chapter, are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law whatsoever, whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned and shall be unassignable.

(2) On the written request of any person eligible to receive benefits under this section, the department may deduct from such payments the premiums for life, health, or other insurance. The request on behalf of any child or children shall be made by the legal guardian of such child or children. The department may provide for such persons one or more plans of group insurance, through contracts with regularly constituted insurance carriers or health care service contractors.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to *RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

[ 2012 c 159 s 21. Prior: 1991 c 365 s 20; 1991 c 35 s 25; 1989 c 360 s 24; 1987 c 326 s 22; 1979 ex.s. c 205 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 12; 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 23. Formerly RCW 41.26.180.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 26.23.060 was amended by 2021 c 35 s 15, changing "notice of payroll deduction" to "income withholding order."

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Effective date—1987 c 326: See RCW 41.50.901.

Purpose—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 257: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.